Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-186
Visitors of facilities; enumerated.

(1) The following persons shall be allowed to visit any facility in the Department of Correctional Services at any time:

(a) Members of the Legislature;

(b) Members of the judiciary;

(c) Members of the Board of Pardons;

(d) Members of the Board of Parole; and

(e) Members of the clergy, subject to the approval of the Director of Correctional Services.

(2) The chief executive officer of a facility may permit any other person to visit the facility.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 17, p. 3083;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 43;

Laws 1990, LB 1067, § 1.